Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FAMILY SENTENCING ALTERNATIVE PROGRAM
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Corrections, in partnership  with the circuit court and
community corrections agencies  of participating counties and the Department of Human
Services, shall establish the Family Sentencing Alternative Program.
(2) A defendant is eligible for the Family Sentencing Alternative Program if:
(a) The  defendant’s presumptive sentence under the sentencing guidelines of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission is a term of imprisonment in the legal and physical custody  of
the Department of Corrections of at least one year; and
(b) The defendant is pregnant at the time of sentencing  or is the parent or legal guardian
of a minor child and at the time of the offense or sentencing had physical custody of  the
child.
(3)(a) If the defendant meets the eligibility requirements described in subsection (2) of
this section and is  eligible for a downward dispositional departure under the rules of the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, the court may order that the defendant  sign a release
authorizing the Department  of Human Services to provide the community corrections agency
with written confirmation of,  and consultation concerning, any open or current juvenile de-
pendency proceeding or any prior  substantiated allegation of abuse or neglect involving the
defendant and a minor child.
(b) The court may  consider eligibility in the Family Sentencing Alternative Program as
a mitigating factor when determining whether to sentence the defendant to probation,  with
a requirement that the defendant participate in the  program as a condition of probation, as
a downward dispositional departure under the rules of the commission.
(4) After receipt of the information described in subsection (3) of this section, the com-
munity corrections agency, in consultation with the Department of Human  Services, shall
determine if the Family Sentencing Alternative  Program is an appropriate program for the
defendant and, if the program is appropriate and the defendant is  sentenced to a term of
Enrolled House Bill 2555 (HB 2555-B) Page 1
probation, require participation in the program for  the probationary sentence. In addition to
the conditions of probation ordered under ORS 137.540, the defendant may be required to
comply with any additional conditions related to the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Geographical restrictions, including house arrest and electronic surveillance;
(b) Participation in vocational training; and
(c) Completion of:
(A) Parenting skills classes;
(B) Drug or alcohol treatment;
(C) Mental health treatment; or
(D) Life skills classes.
(5) The  Department of Human Services and community corrections agencies shall coop-
erate with the Department of Corrections in implementing the Family Sentencing  Alterna-
tive Program described in this section.
(6) The Department of Human Services  and the Department of Corrections shall jointly
submit a report concerning the Family Sentencing  Alternative Program, which must include
program outcomes and data related  to the efficacy of the program, and which may include
recommendations for legislation, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the  interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to the judiciary no later than January 1 of
each year.
(7) The Department of  Corrections shall establish a process for selecting counties to
participate in the Family Sentencing Alternative Program.
(8) The Department of Corrections and the Department of Human  Services may adopt
rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(9) Services provided under  the Family Sentencing Alternative Program must be cul-
turally specific and gender-responsive whenever possible.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 2,
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
(2) Section 4, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, is repealed.
SECTION 3.
The Legislative Assembly intends that if this  2025 Act becomes law after
June 30, 2025, section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be operative retroactively to June  30, 2025. All
actions consistent with section 1 of this 2025 Act taken by the Department  of Corrections,
the Department of Human Services, a circuit court or a community corrections agency  of a
participating county, after June 30, 2025, and  prior to the effective date of this 2025 Act are
hereby ratified and approved.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 4.  Section 1, chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Sections 7 , [ to] 8 and 10 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017 , section
5, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2018, section 1 of this 2025 Act,  the amendments to  ORS 137.717 and
421.168 [ and section 1, chapter 830, Oregon Laws 2015, ] by sections [ 2,] 4, 5 and 6 [ of this 2017 Act ],
chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017,  and the repeal of section 16, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013, by
section 3 [ of this 2017 Act ], chapter 673, Oregon Laws 2017,  shall be known and may  be cited as
the Safety and Savings Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5004), for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, for community cor-
rections, is increased by $2,648,236 to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 2555 (HB 2555-B) Page 2
SECTION 6. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2555 (HB 2555-B) Page 3